Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIV Public Utilities
Antenna Towers

278.650.
Procedures for proposals to construct antenna towers in an area outside the jurisdiction of a planning commission — Hearing — Building permit fee.

If an applicant proposes construction of an antenna tower for cellular telecommunications services or personal communications services which is to be located in an area outside the jurisdiction of a planning commission, or outside the jurisdiction of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet pursuant to KRS 56.463(4)(a), the applicant shall apply to the Public Service Commission for a certificate of public convenience and necessity pursuant to KRS 278.020(1),

278.665

, and this section. The commission shall convene a local public hearing on the application upon the receipt of a request from the local governing body or from not less than three (3) interested persons that reside in a county or municipal corporation in which the tower is proposed to be constructed. In reviewing the application, the commission may take into account the character of the general area concerned and the likely effects of the installation on nearby land uses and values. A local government may charge a fee for a building permit, in connection with the construction or alteration of any structure for cellular telecommunications services or personal communication services, if the fee does not exceed that charged for any other commercial structure of comparable cost of construction.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 383, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 2002, ch. 343, § 6, effective April 23, 2002; 2002, ch. 346, § 222, effective July 15, 2002; 2016 ch. 74, § 2, effective July 15, 2016.

278.660.
Confidentiality of uniform application and updates — Penalty for violation. [Repealed.]

278.665.
Administrative regulations governing cellular antenna towers to be constructed outside the jurisdiction of a planning commission.

The commission shall, by administrative regulation promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, establish the minimum content of an application for a certificate of convenience and necessity to construct cellular antenna towers for areas outside the jurisdiction of a planning commission.

The commission, in establishing the public notice requirements of an application as provided for in subsection (1) of this section, shall distinguish between areas of low and high population densities. At a minimum, when the site of the proposed cellular antenna tower is outside of an incorporated city, the commission shall require that every person who owns property contiguous to the property where the proposed cellular antenna tower will be located receives notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, of the proposed construction, given the commission docket number under which the application will be processed, and informed of the opportunity to intervene in the commission proceedings on the application.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 231, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 103, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 343, § 7, effective April 23, 2002; 2002, ch. 346, § 223, effective July 15, 2002.